Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3469.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 270.84, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 1a. new text end new text begin Yield capitalization rate; adjustment. new text end new text begin If the commissioner calculates a yield capitalization rate to determine the unit value of railroad property for a given year, the commissioner shall compare the resulting rate with the respective yield capitalization rates calculated by the respective governing agencies in the states of Wisconsin, Iowa, South Dakota, and North Dakota. The commissioner shall adjust the yield capitalization rate to be no less than 0.05 percent of the lowest yield capitalization rate set in Wisconsin, Iowa, South Dakota, and North Dakota. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for taxes payable in 2025 and thereafter. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 273.11, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 24. new text end new text begin Valuation exclusion for improvements to certain railroad property. new text end new text begin (a) Property classified under section 273.13, subdivision 24, and improved as provided in this subdivision, qualifies for a valuation exclusion for assessment purposes. new text end new text begin (b) To be eligible for the valuation exclusion in this subdivision, improvements to railroad property must meet the following conditions: new text end new text begin (1) the improvements must have been implemented to accommodate a public transit program, light rail transit, commuter rail, or intercity passenger rail; new text end new text begin (2) the improvements include but are not limited to: (i) subgrade work; (ii) grading; (iii) adding subgrade material; and (iv) utilizing ballast, ties, rail, materials to attach the rails to the ties, and rail switches to join rail sidings to a main rail line; and new text end new text begin (3) the improvements were made after January 1, 2016. new text end new text begin (c) The commissioner of revenue must estimate the market value of the railroad property in the assessment year immediately following the year that the taxpayer notified the commissioner that an improvement was made. The commissioner must apply the exclusion provided under this subdivision proportionately across all railroad operating property within the state. The commissioner must require an application. Applications must be received by December 31 each year in order to be effective for taxes payable in the following year. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective retroactively for assessment year 2024. new text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 273.11, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 25. new text end new text begin Valuation exclusion for safety improvements to certain railroad property. new text end new text begin (a) Property classified under section 273.13, subdivision 24, and improved as provided in this subdivision, qualifies for a valuation exclusion for assessment purposes. new text end new text begin (b) To be eligible for the valuation exclusion in this subdivision, improvements to railroad property must meet the following conditions: new text end new text begin (1) the improvements to the rail line must have been implemented in connection to or funded by a state or federal safety program or funded by a state or federal safety grant program; new text end new text begin (2) the improvements include but are not limited to: (i) rail replacement to a heavier weight rail; (ii) eliminating and replacing existing rail joints; (iii) utilizing ballast, ties, and materials to attach the rails to the ties; (iv) surfacing joint-eliminated rails or continuous welded rail; and (v) bridge repairs or strengthening weight rating of bridges; and new text end new text begin (3) the improvements were made after January 1, 2016. new text end new text begin (c) The commissioner of revenue must estimate the market value of the railroad property in the assessment year immediately following the year that the taxpayer notified the commissioner that an improvement was made. The commissioner must apply the exclusion provided under this subdivision proportionately across all railroad operating property within the state. The commissioner must require an application. Applications must be received by December 31 each year in order to be effective for taxes payable in the following year. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective retroactively for assessment year 2024. new text end Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 273.11, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 26. new text end new text begin Valuation exclusion for environmental safety improvements to certain railroad property. new text end new text begin (a) Property classified under section 271.13, subdivision 24, and improved as provided in this subdivision, qualifies for a valuation exclusion for assessment purposes. new text end new text begin (b) To be eligible for the valuation exclusion in this subdivision, improvements to railroad property must meet the following conditions: new text end new text begin (1) the improvements to the railroad property must have been for locomotive emission reductions implemented in connection to or funded by a state or federal safety grant program; new text end new text begin (2) the improvements were either: (i) modifying existing locomotives to reduce emissions; or (ii) replacing existing locomotives with new emission-reducing locomotives; and new text end new text begin (3) the improvements were made after January 1, 2016. new text end new text begin (c) The commissioner of revenue must estimate the market value of the railroad property in the assessment year immediately following the year that the taxpayer notified the commissioner that an improvement was made. The commissioner must apply the exclusion provided under this subdivision proportionately across all railroad operating property within the state. The commissioner must require an application. Applications must be received by December 31 each year in order to be effective for taxes payable in the following year. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective retroactively for assessment year 2024. new text end